California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(5) The likely date by which the minor may be returned to and safely maintained in the home or placed for adoption, appointed a legal guardian, permanently placed with
 a fit and willing relative, or, if the minor is 16 years of age or older, referred to another planned permanent living arrangement.

(6) (A) In the case of a minor who has reached 16 years of age, the court shall, in addition, determine the services needed to assist the minor to make the transition from foster care to successful adulthood.

(B) The court shall make these determinations on a case-by-case basis and reference in its written findings the probation officer’s report and any other evidence relied upon in reaching its decision.

(7) (A) For a child who is 10 years of age or older, is in junior high, middle, or high school, and has been declared a ward of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 601 or 602 for a year or longer whether the probation officer has taken the
 actions described in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 366.

(B) On or before January 1, 2023, the Judicial Council shall amend and adopt rules of court and develop appropriate forms for the implementation of this paragraph.

(8) For a child who is 16 years of age or older or for a nonminor dependent, whether the probation officer has, pursuant to the requirements of paragraph (22) of subdivision (g) of Section 16501.1, identified the person or persons who shall be responsible for assisting the child or nonminor dependent with applications for postsecondary education and related financial aid, or that the child or nonminor dependent stated that they do not want to pursue postsecondary education, including career or technical education.

(f) At any status review hearing prior to the first
 permanency hearing, after considering the admissible and relevant evidence, the court shall order return of the minor to the physical custody of the minor’s parent or legal guardian unless the court finds, by a preponderance of evidence, that the return of the minor to the minor’s parent or legal guardian would create a substantial risk of detriment to the safety, protection, or physical or emotional well-being of the minor. The probation department shall have the burden of establishing that detriment. In making its determination, the court shall review and consider the social study report, recommendations, and the case plan pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 706.5, the report and recommendations of any child advocate appointed for the minor in the case, and any other reports submitted to the court pursuant to subdivision (d), and shall consider the efforts or progress, or both, demonstrated by the minor and family and the extent to which the minor availed themselves of the services provided.

(g) At all status review hearings subsequent to the first permanency planning hearing, the court shall consider the safety of the minor and make the findings and orders as described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, and (6) of subdivision (e). The court shall either make a finding that the previously ordered permanent plan continues to be appropriate or shall order that a new permanent plan be adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 727.3. However, the court shall not order a permanent plan of “return to the physical custody of the parent or legal guardian after further reunification services are offered,” as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 727.3.

(h) The status review hearings required by subdivision (c) may be heard by an administrative review panel, provided that the administrative panel meets all of the requirements listed in subparagraph (B) of
 paragraph (7) of subdivision (d) of Section 727.4.

(i) (1) At any status review hearing at which a recommendation to terminate delinquency jurisdiction is being considered, or at the status review hearing held closest to the ward attaining 18 years of age, but no fewer than 90 days before the ward’s 18th birthday, the court shall consider whether to modify its jurisdiction pursuant to Section 601 or 602 and assume transition jurisdiction over the minor pursuant to Section 450. The probation department shall address this issue in its report to the court and make a recommendation as to whether transition jurisdiction is appropriate for the minor.

(2) The court shall order the probation department or the minor’s attorney to submit an application to the child welfare services department pursuant to Section 329 to declare the minor a dependent of the court and
 modify its jurisdiction from delinquency to dependency jurisdiction if it finds both of the following:

(A) The ward does not come within the description set forth in Section 450, but jurisdiction as a ward may no longer be required.

(B) The ward appears to come within the description of Section 300 and cannot be returned home safely.

(3) The court shall set a hearing within 20 judicial days of the date of its order issued pursuant to paragraph (2) to review the decision of the child welfare services department and may either affirm the decision not to file a petition pursuant to Section 300 or order the child welfare services department to file a petition pursuant to Section 300.

(j) If a review hearing pursuant to this section is the last review
 hearing to be held before the minor attains 18 years of age, the court shall ensure that the minor’s transitional independent living case plan includes a plan for the minor to meet one or more of the criteria in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403, so that the minor can become a nonminor dependent, and that the minor has been informed of the minor’s right to decline to become a nonminor dependent and to seek termination of the court’s jurisdiction pursuant to Section 607.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 27.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

727.25.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the court may order family reunification services to continue for a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, if all parties are in agreement that the continued provision of court-ordered family reunification services is in the best interests of the nonminor dependent, and there is a substantial probability that the nonminor dependent will be able to safely reside in the home of the parent or guardian by the next review hearing. The continuation of court-ordered family reunification services shall not exceed the timeframes in Section 727.3.

(b) If all parties are not in agreement or the court finds there is not a substantial probability that the nonminor will be able to return and
 safely reside in the home of the parent or guardian, the court shall terminate reunification services to the parents or guardian.

(c) The continuation of court-ordered family reunification services under this section does not affect the nonminor’s eligibility for extended foster care benefits as a nonminor dependent as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400. The reviews conducted for any nonminor dependent shall be pursuant to Section 366.31.

(d) The extension of reunification services only applies to youth under the delinquency jurisdiction of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 846, Sec. 31.   (AB 1712)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

727.3.

The purpose of this section is to provide a means to monitor the safety and well-being of every minor in foster care who has been declared a ward of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 601 or 602 and to ensure that everything reasonably possible is done to facilitate the safe and early return of the minor to his or her own home or to establish an alternative permanent plan for the minor.

(a) (1) For every minor declared a ward and ordered to be placed in foster care, a permanency planning hearing shall be conducted within 12 months of the date the minor entered foster care, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 727.4. Subsequent permanency planning hearings
 shall be conducted periodically, but no less frequently than once every 12 months thereafter during the period of placement. It shall be the duty of the probation officer to prepare a written social study report including an updated case plan and a recommendation for a permanent plan, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 706.5, and submit the report to the court prior to each permanency planning hearing, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 727.4.

(2) Prior to any permanency planning hearing involving a minor in the physical custody of a community care facility or foster family agency, the facility or agency may file with the court a report containing its recommendations, in addition to the probation officer’s social study. Prior to any permanency planning hearing involving the physical custody of a foster parent, relative caregiver, preadoptive
 parent, or legal guardian, that person may present to the court a report containing his or her recommendations. The court shall consider all reports and recommendations filed pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) If the minor has a continuing involvement with his or her parents or legal guardians, the parents or legal guardians shall be involved in the planning for a permanent placement. The court order placing the minor in a permanent placement shall include a specification of the nature and frequency of visiting arrangements with the parents or legal guardians and, if any, the siblings.

(4) At each permanency planning hearing, the court shall order a permanent plan for the minor, as described in subdivision (b). The court shall also make findings, as described in subdivision (e) of
 Section 727.2. In the case of a minor who has reached 16 years of age or older, the court shall, in addition, determine the services needed to assist the minor to make the transition from foster care to successful adulthood. The court shall make all of these determinations on a case-by-case basis and make reference to the probation officer’s report, the case plan, or other evidence relied upon in making its decisions.

(5) When the minor is 16 years of age or older, and is in another planned permanent living arrangement, the court, at each permanency planning hearing, shall do all of the following:

(A) Ask the minor about his or her desired permanency outcome.

(B) Make a judicial determination explaining why, as of the hearing
 date, another planned permanent living arrangement is the best permanency plan for the minor.

(C) State for the record the compelling reason or reasons why it continues not to be in the best interest of the minor to return home, be placed for adoption, be placed with a legal guardian, or be placed with a fit and willing relative.

(b) At all permanency planning hearings, the court shall determine the permanent plan for the minor. The court shall order one of the following permanent plans, in order of priority:

(1) Return of the minor to the physical custody of the parent or legal guardian. After considering the admissible and relevant evidence, the court shall order the return of the minor to the physical custody of his or her
 parent or legal guardian unless:

(A) Reunification services were not offered, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 727.2.

(B) The court finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the return of the minor to his or her parent or legal guardian would create a substantial risk of detriment to the safety, protection, or
 physical or emotional well-being of the minor. The probation department shall have the burden of establishing that detriment. In making its determination, the court shall review and consider the social study report and recommendations pursuant to Section 706.5, the report and recommendations of any child advocate appointed for the minor in the case, and any other reports submitted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), and shall consider the efforts or progress, or both, demonstrated by the minor and family and the extent to which the minor availed himself or herself of the services provided.

(2) Order that the permanent plan for the minor will be to return the minor to the physical custody of the parent or legal guardian, order further reunification services to be provided to the minor and his or her parent or legal
 guardian for a period not to exceed six months and continue the case for up to six months for a subsequent permanency planning hearing, provided that the subsequent hearing shall occur within 18 months of the date the minor was originally taken from the physical custody of his or her parent or legal guardian. The court shall continue the case only if it finds that there is a substantial probability that the minor will be returned to the physical custody of his or her parent or legal guardian and safely maintained in the home within the extended period of time or that reasonable services have not been provided to the parent or guardian. For purposes of this section, in order to find that there is a substantial probability that the minor will be returned to the physical custody of his or her parent or legal guardian, the court shall be required to find that the minor and his or her parent or legal
 guardian have demonstrated the capacity and ability to complete the objectives of the case plan.

The court shall inform the parent or legal guardian that if the minor cannot be returned home by the next permanency planning hearing, a proceeding pursuant to Section 727.31 may be initiated.

The court shall not continue the case for further reunification services if it has been 18 months or more since the date the minor was originally taken from the physical custody of his or her parent or legal guardian.

(3) Identify adoption as the permanent plan and order that a hearing be held within 120 days, pursuant to the procedures described in Section 727.31. The court shall only set a hearing pursuant to Section 727.31 if there is clear and convincing evidence that
 reasonable services have been provided or offered to the parents. When the court sets a hearing pursuant to Section 727.31, it shall order that an adoption assessment report be prepared, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 727.31.

(4) Order a legal guardianship, pursuant to procedures described in subdivisions (c) to (f), inclusive, of Section 728.

(5) Place the minor with a fit and willing relative. “Placement with a fit and willing relative” means placing the minor with an appropriate approved relative who is willing to provide a permanent and stable home for the minor, but is unable or unwilling to become the legal guardian. When a minor is placed with a fit and willing relative, the court may authorize the relative to provide the same legal consent for the minor’s medical,
 surgical, and dental care, and education as the custodial parent of the minor.

(6) (A) If he or she is 16 years of age or older, place the minor in another planned permanent living arrangement. For purposes of this section, “planned permanent living arrangement” means any permanent living arrangement described in Section 11402 that is ordered by the court for a minor 16 years of age or older when there is a compelling reason or reasons to determine that it is not in the best interest of the minor to have any permanent plan listed in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive. These plans include, but are not limited to, placement in a specific, identified foster home, program, or facility on a permanent basis, or placement with a transitional housing placement provider. When the court places a minor in a planned permanent living
 arrangement, the court shall specify the goal of the placement, which may include, but shall not be limited to, return home, emancipation, guardianship, or permanent placement with a relative.

The court shall only order that the minor remain in a planned permanent living arrangement if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence, based upon the evidence already presented to it, that there is a compelling reason, as defined in subdivision (c), for determining that a plan of termination of parental rights and adoption is not in the best interest of the minor.

(B) If the minor is under 16 years of age and the court finds by clear and convincing evidence, based upon the evidence already presented to it, that there is a compelling reason, as defined in subdivision (c), for determining that a plan of
 termination of parental rights and adoption is not in the best interest of the minor as of the hearing date, the court shall order the minor to remain in a foster care placement with a permanent plan of return home, adoption, legal guardianship, or placement with a fit and willing relative, as appropriate. The court shall make factual findings identifying any barriers to achieving the permanent plan as of the hearing date.

(c) A compelling reason for determining that a plan of termination of parental rights and adoption is not in the best interest of the minor is any of the following:

(1) Documentation by the probation department that adoption is not in the best interest of the minor and is not an appropriate permanency goal. That documentation may include, but is not limited
 to, documentation that:

(A) The minor is 12 years of age or older and objects to termination of parental rights.

(B) The minor is 17 years of age or older and specifically requests that transition to independent living with the identification of a caring adult to serve as a lifelong connection be established as his or her permanent plan. On and after January 1, 2012, this includes a minor who requests that his or her transitional independent living case plan include modification of his or her jurisdiction to that of dependency jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 607.2 or subdivision (i) of Section 727.2, or to that of transition jurisdiction pursuant to Section 450, in order to be eligible as a nonminor dependent for the extended benefits pursuant to Section
 11403.

(C) The parent or guardian and the minor have a significant bond, but the parent or guardian is unable to care for the minor because of an emotional or physical disability, and the minor’s caregiver has committed to raising the minor to the age of majority and facilitating visitation with the disabled parent or guardian.

(D) The minor agrees to continued placement in a residential treatment facility that provides services specifically designed to address the minor’s treatment needs, and the minor’s needs could not be served by a less restrictive placement.

The probation department’s recommendation that adoption is not in the best interest of the minor shall be based on the present family circumstances of the minor and shall not preclude
 a different recommendation at a later date if the minor’s family circumstances change.

(2) Documentation by the probation department that no grounds exist to file for termination of parental rights.

(3) Documentation by the probation department that the minor is an unaccompanied refugee minor, or there are international legal obligations or foreign policy reasons that would preclude terminating parental rights.

(4) A finding by the court that the probation department was required to make reasonable efforts to reunify the minor with the family pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 727.2, and did not make those efforts.

(5) Documentation by the
 probation department that the minor is living with a relative who is unable or unwilling to adopt the minor because of exceptional circumstances that do not include an unwillingness to accept legal or financial responsibility for the minor, but who is willing to provide, and capable of providing, the minor with a stable and permanent home environment, and the removal of the minor from the physical custody of his or her relative would be detrimental to the minor’s emotional well-being.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the ability of a parent to voluntarily relinquish his or her child to the State Department of Social Services when it is acting as an adoption agency or to a county adoption agency at any time while the minor is a ward of the juvenile court if the department or county adoption agency is willing to accept
 the relinquishment.

(e) Any change in the permanent plan of a minor placed with a fit and willing relative or in a planned permanent living arrangement shall be made only by order of the court pursuant to a petition filed in accordance with Section 778 or at a regularly scheduled and noticed status review hearing or permanency planning hearing. Any change in the permanent plan of a minor placed in a guardianship shall be made only by order of the court pursuant to a motion filed in accordance with Section 728.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 731, Sec. 6.   (SB 612)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

727.31.

(a) This section applies to all minors placed in out-of-home care pursuant to Section 727.2 or 727.3 and for whom the juvenile court orders a hearing to consider permanently terminating parental rights to free the minor for adoption.

Except for subdivision (j) of Section 366.26, the procedures for permanently terminating parental rights for minors described by this section shall proceed exclusively pursuant to Section 366.26.

At the beginning of any proceeding pursuant to this section, if the minor is not being represented by previously retained or appointed counsel, the court shall appoint counsel to represent the minor, and the minor shall be present in court unless the minor or the minor’s counsel so requests and the court so orders. If
 a parent appears without counsel and is unable to afford counsel, the court shall appoint counsel for the parent, unless this representation is knowingly and intelligently waived. The same counsel shall not be appointed to represent both the minor and the parent. Private counsel appointed under this section shall receive a reasonable sum for compensation and expenses as specified in subdivision (f) of paragraph (3) of Section 366.26.

(b) Whenever the court orders that a hearing pursuant to this section shall be held, it shall direct the agency supervising the minor and the county adoption agency, or the State Department of Social Services when it is acting as an adoption agency, to prepare an assessment that
 shall include all of the following:

(1) Current search efforts for an absent parent or parents.

(2) A review of the amount and nature of any contact between the minor and his or her parents and other members of his or her extended family since the time of placement. Although the extended family of each minor shall be reviewed on a case-by-case basis, “extended family” for the purpose of the paragraph shall include, but not be limited to, the minor’s siblings, grandparents, aunts, and uncles.

(3) An evaluation of the minor’s medical, developmental, scholastic, mental, and emotional status.

(4) A preliminary assessment of the eligibility and commitment of any identified prospective adoptive parent or guardian, particularly the caretaker, to include a
 social history, including screening for criminal records and prior referrals for child abuse or neglect, the capability to meet the minor’s needs, and the understanding of the legal and financial rights and responsibilities of adoption and guardianship. If a proposed guardian is a relative of the minor, the assessment shall also consider, but need not be limited to, all of the factors specified in subdivision (a) of Section 361.3 and Section 361.4.

(5) The relationship of the minor to any identified prospective adoptive parent or guardian, the duration and character of the relationship, the degree of attachment of the child to the prospective relative guardian or adoptive parent, the relative’s or adoptive parent’s strong commitment to caring permanently for the child, the motivation for seeking adoption or guardianship, a statement from the minor concerning placement and the adoption or guardianship, and whether the minor, if over 12 years of
 age, has been consulted about the proposed relative guardianship arrangements, unless the minor’s age or physical, emotional, or other condition precludes his or her meaningful response, and if so, a description of the condition.

(6) An analysis of the likelihood that the minor will be adopted if parental rights are terminated.

(c) A relative caregiver’s preference for legal guardianship over adoption, if it is due to circumstances that do not include an unwillingness to accept legal or financial responsibility for the child, shall not constitute the sole basis for recommending removal of the child from the relative caregiver for purposes of adoptive placement. A relative caregiver shall be given information regarding the permanency options of guardianship and adoption, including the long-term benefits and consequences of each option, prior to establishing legal guardianship or
 pursuing adoption.

(d) If at any hearing held pursuant to Section 366.26, a legal guardianship is established for the minor with an approved relative caregiver and juvenile court dependency is subsequently dismissed, the minor shall be eligible for aid under the Kin-GAP Program, as provided for in Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385), as applicable, of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9.

(e) For purposes of this section, “relative” means an adult who is related to the child by blood, adoption, or affinity within the fifth degree of kinship, including stepparents, stepsiblings, and all relatives whose status is preceded by the words “great,” “great-great,” or “grand,” or the spouse of any of those persons, even if the marriage was terminated by death or dissolution.

(f) Whenever the court orders that a hearing pursuant to procedures described in this section be held, it shall order that the county adoption agency, or the State Department of Social Services when it is acting as an adoption agency, has exclusive responsibility for determining the adoptive placement and making all adoption-related decisions.

(g) If the court, by order of judgment declares the minor free from the custody and control of both parents, or one parent if the other does not have custody and control, the court shall at the same time order the minor referred to the State Department of Social Services when it is acting as an adoption agency
 or a
 county adoption agency for adoptive placement by the agency. The order shall state that responsibility for custody of the minor shall be held jointly by the probation department and the State Department of Social Services when it is acting as an adoption agency
 or the county adoption agency. The order shall also state that the State Department of Social Services when it is acting as an adoption agency or the county adoption agency has exclusive responsibility for determining the adoptive placement and for making all adoption-related decisions. However, no petition for adoption may be granted until the appellate rights of the natural parents have been exhausted.

(h) The notice procedures for terminating parental rights for minors described by this section shall proceed exclusively pursuant to Section 366.23.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 63.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

727.32.

(a) In any case where a minor has been declared a ward of the juvenile court and has been in foster care for 15 of the most recent 22 months, the probation department shall follow the procedures described in Section 727.31 to terminate the parental rights of the minor’s parents, unless the probation department has documented in the probation department file a compelling reason for determining that termination of the parental rights would not be in the minor’s best interests, or the probation department has not provided the family with reasonable efforts necessary to achieve reunification. For purposes of this section, compelling reasons for not terminating parental rights are those described in subdivision (c) of Section 727.3.

(b) For the purposes of this
 section, 15 out of the 22 months shall be calculated from the “date entered foster care,” as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 727.4. When a minor experiences multiple exits from and entries into foster care during the 22-month period, the 15 months shall be calculated by adding together the total number of months the minor spent in foster care in the past 22 months. However, trial home visits and runaway episodes should not be included in calculating 15 months in foster care.

(c) If the probation department documented a compelling reason at the time of the permanency planning hearing, pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (13) of subdivision (c) of Section 706.6, the probation department need not provide any additional documentation to comply with the requirements of this section.

(d) When the probation department sets a hearing pursuant to Section 727.31, it shall concurrently make efforts to identify an approved family for adoption, and follow the procedures described in subdivision (b) of Section 727.31.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 6.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

727.4.

(a) (1) Notice of any hearing pursuant to Section 727, 727.2, or 727.3 shall be served by the probation officer to the minor, the minor’s parent or guardian, any adult provider of care to the minor, including, but not limited to, foster parents, relative caregivers, preadoptive parents, resource family, community care facility, or foster family agency, and to the counsel of record if the counsel of record was not present at the time that the hearing was set by the court, by first-class mail addressed to the last known address of the person to be
 notified, by personal service on those persons, or by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5, not earlier than 30 days nor later than 15 days preceding the date of the hearing. The notice shall contain a statement regarding the nature of the status review or permanency planning hearing and any change in the custody or status of the minor being recommended by the probation department. The notice shall also include a statement informing the foster parents, relative caregivers, or preadoptive parents that they may attend all hearings or may submit any information they deem relevant to the court in writing. The foster parents, relative caregiver, and preadoptive parents are entitled to notice and opportunity to be heard but need not be made parties to the proceedings. Proof of notice shall be filed with the court.

(2) If the court
 or probation officer knows or has reason to know that the minor is or may be an Indian child, any notice sent under this section shall comply with the requirements of Section
 224.3.

(b) At least 10 calendar days before each status review and permanency planning hearing, after the hearing during which the court orders that the care, custody, and control of the minor to be under the supervision of the probation officer for placement pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 727, the probation officer shall file a social study report with the court, pursuant to the requirements listed in Section 706.5.

(c) The probation department shall inform the minor, the minor’s parent or guardian, and all counsel of record that a copy of the social study prepared for the hearing will be available 10 days before the hearing and may be obtained from the probation officer.

(d) As used in Article 15
 (commencing with Section 625) to Article 18 (commencing with Section 725), inclusive:

(1) “Foster care” means residential care provided in any of the settings described in Section 11402 or 11402.01.

(2) “At risk of entering foster care” means that conditions within a minor’s family may necessitate their entry into foster care unless those conditions are resolved.

(3) “Preadoptive parent” means a licensed foster parent who has been approved for adoption by the State Department of Social Services when it is acting as an adoption agency or by a licensed adoption agency.

(4) “Date of entry into foster care” means the date that is 60 days after the date on which
 the minor was removed from their home, unless one of the exceptions below applies:

(A) If the minor is detained pending foster care placement, and remains detained for more than 60 days, then the date of entry into foster care means the date the court adjudges the minor a ward and orders the minor placed in foster care under the supervision of the probation officer.

(B) If, before the minor is placed in foster care, the minor is committed to a ranch, camp, school, or other institution pending placement, and remains in that facility for more than 60 days, then the “date of entry into foster care” is the date the minor is physically placed in foster care.

(C) If at the time the wardship petition was filed, the minor was a
 dependent of the juvenile court and in out-of-home placement, then the “date of entry into foster care” is the earlier of the date the juvenile court made a finding of abuse or neglect, or 60 days after the date on which the child was removed from their
 home.

(5) “Reasonable efforts” means:

(A) Efforts made to prevent or eliminate the need for removing the minor from the minor’s home.

(B) Efforts to make it possible for the minor to return home, including, but not limited to, case management, counseling, parenting training, mentoring programs, vocational training, educational services, substance abuse treatment, transportation, and therapeutic day services.

(C) Efforts to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize a permanent plan for the minor.

(D) In an Indian child custody proceeding, as defined in subdivision (d) of
 Section 224.1, “reasonable efforts” includes all of the efforts described in subparagraphs (B) and (C), but they shall include all of the standards and requirements specified for “active efforts” as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 224.1 and as required by Section 361.7.

(6) “Relative” means an adult who is related to the minor by blood, adoption, or affinity within the fifth degree of kinship including stepparents, stepsiblings, and all relatives whose status is preceded by the words “great,” “great-great,” “grand,” or the spouse of any of these persons even if the marriage was terminated by death or dissolution. “Relative” shall also include an “extended family member” as defined in
 Section 224.1.

(7) “Hearing” means a noticed proceeding with findings and orders that are made on a case-by-case basis, heard by either of the following:

(A) A judicial officer, in a courtroom, recorded by a court reporter.

(B) An administrative panel, provided that the hearing is a status review hearing and that the administrative panel meets the following conditions:

(i) The administrative review shall be open to participation by the minor and parents or legal guardians and all those persons entitled to notice under subdivision (a).

(ii) The minor and their parents or
 legal guardians receive proper notice as required in subdivision (a).

(iii) The administrative review panel is composed of persons appointed by the presiding judge of the juvenile court, the membership of which shall include at least one person who is not responsible for the case management of, or delivery of services to, the minor or the parents who are the subjects of the review.

(iv) The findings of the administrative review panel shall be submitted to the juvenile court for the court’s approval and shall become part of the official court record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 24.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

727.5.

If a minor is found to be a person described in Section 601, the court may order the minor to perform community service, including, but not limited to, graffiti cleanup, for a total time not to exceed 20 hours over a period not to exceed 30 days, during a time other than his or her hours of school attendance or employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1202, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

727.6.

Where any minor has been adjudged a ward of the court for the commission of a “sexually violent offense,” as defined in Section 6600, and committed to the Department of the Youth Authority, the ward shall be given sexual offender treatment consistent with protocols for that treatment developed or implemented by the Department of the Youth Authority.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 727.2 (as added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 995) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 287, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

727.7.

(a) If a minor is found to be a person described in Section 601 or 602 and the court finds that the minor is a first-time offender and orders that a parent or guardian retain custody of that minor, the court may order the parent or guardian to attend antigang violence parenting classes if the court finds the presence of significant risk factors for gang involvement on the part of the minor.

(b) The Department of Justice shall establish curriculum for the antigang violence parenting classes required pursuant to this section, including, but not limited to, all of the following criteria:

(1) A meeting in which the families of innocent victims of gang violence share their experience.

(2) A meeting in which the surviving parents of a deceased gang member share their experience.

(3) How to identify gang and drug activity in children.

(4) How to communicate effectively with adolescents.

(5) An overview of pertinent support agencies and organizations for intervention, education, job training, and positive recreational activities, including telephone numbers, locations,
 and contact names of those agencies and organizations.

(6) The potential fines and periods of incarceration for the commission of additional gang-related offenses.

(7) The potential penalties that may be imposed upon parents for aiding and abetting crimes committed by their children.

(c) For purposes of this section, “gang-related” means that the minor was an active participant in a criminal street gang, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 186.22 of the Penal Code, or committed an offense for the benefit of, or at the direction of, a criminal street gang, as specified in subdivision (b) or (d) of Section 186.22 of the Penal Code.

(d) The father, mother, spouse, or other person liable for the support of the minor, the estate of that person, and
 the estate of the minor shall be liable for the cost of classes ordered pursuant to this section, unless the court finds that the person or estate does not have the financial ability to pay. In evaluating financial ability to pay, the court shall take into consideration the combined household income, the necessary obligations of the household, the number of persons dependent upon this income, and whether reduced monthly payments would obviate the need to waive liability for the full costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 258, Sec. 1.   (AB 177)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

728.
